Hawaii statutes.
§651-32 Execution, district court; form.
Every district judge at the request of the party recovering any civil judgment
in the judge's court, unless the judgment is duly appealed from, shall issue
the judge's execution against the property of the party recovered against,
which execution may be in the form established by the usage and practice of the
issuing court and may be directed to any police officer of the judicial circuit
in which the district court is situated; provided the defendant or any of the
defendants is a resident of the circuit. [CC 1859, §1016; RL 1925, §2437; RL
1935, §4136; RL 1945, §10163; RL 1955, §233-31; am L 1963, c 108, §4; HRS
§651-32; am L 1970, c 188, §§39, 40; am L 1998, c 36, §2]

Case Notes

Chose in action not subject to levy and sale upon execution.
26 H. 699 (1923).

Issuance of execution not necessary to perfect judgment
lien. 28 H. 395, 397 (1925).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next